Alabama, session 2026rs, HB43.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
66 Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
67 of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
68 PROPOSED AMENDMENT
69 (a)(1) Each local board of education shall adopt a
70 policy requiring each public K-12 school under its
71 jurisdiction, at the commencement of the first class each
72 school day, to conduct The Pledge of Allegiance to the United
73 States flag and give all students the opportunity to
74 voluntarily recite The Pledge of Allegiance to the United
75 States flag.
76 (2) Violations of this subsection may be reported to
77 the local superintendent of education. The local
78 superintendent of education shall review the violation. If the
79 local superintendent of education determines the report is
80 founded and the violation is not resolved, he or she shall
81 report the violation to the State Superintendent of Education,
82 who shall conduct an investigation. If the State
83 Superintendent of Education, based on the results of the
84 investigation, determines that a local board of education or
Page 3

investigation, determines that a local board of education or
HB43 INTRODUCED
85 any school under that local board's jurisdiction has shown a
86 continued pattern of intentional refusal to comply with this
87 subsection, the State Superintendent of Education shall
88 withhold 25 percent of the state funding allocated to that
89 local board of education for the following fiscal year. If the
90 local board of education or any school under that board's
91 jurisdiction continues to violate this section, the
92 Legislature shall provide for further reduction of funding to
93 the local board of education in the annual appropriation of
94 education funds.
95 (b)(1) No later than 90 days after the ratification of
96 this amendment, each local board of education shall vote
97 whether to adopt a policy requiring each public K-12 school
98 under its jurisdiction to provide students and employees with
99 an opportunity to participate in a period of prayer and
100 reading of the Bible or other religious text on each school
101 day. A policy adopted pursuant to this subsection shall
102 reflect all of the following:
103 a. Prohibit a student or employee of the local board of
104 education from being permitted to participate in the period of
105 prayer and reading of the Bible or other religious text unless
106 the employee or parent or guardian of the student submits a
107 signed consent form to the local board of education that
108 includes all of the following:
109 1. An acknowledgment that the student or employee has a
110 choice as to whether to participate in the period of prayer
111 and reading of the Bible or other religious text.
112 2. A statement that the individual has no objection to
Page 4

2. A statement that the individual has no objection to
HB43 INTRODUCED
113 the student's or employee's participation in or hearing of the
114 prayer or readings offered during the period.
115 3. An express waiver of the individual's right to bring
116 a claim under state or federal law arising out of the adoption
117 of a policy under this section, including a claim under the
118 Establishment Clause of the First Amendment to the United
119 States Constitution or a related state or federal law,
120 releasing the local board of education, public K-12 school,
121 and school employees from liability for those claims.
122 b. Prohibit the provision of a prayer or reading of the
123 Bible or other religious text over a public address system.
124 c. Specify that a period of prayer or a reading of the
125 Bible or other religious text may not be a substitute for
126 instructional time. In order to comply with this paragraph,
127 the policy may require the period of prayer and reading of the
128 Bible or other religious text be provided as follows:
129 1. Before normal school hours.
130 2. Only in classrooms or other areas in which a consent
131 form under paragraph a. has been submitted for every employee
132 and student.
133 3. By any other method recommended by the Attorney
134 General or legal counsel of the local board of education.
135 d. Include provisions ensuring a prayer or reading of
136 the Bible or other religious text is not provided in the
137 physical presence of, within the hearing of, or in another
138 manner which would constitute an injury in fact on an
139 individual for whom a signed consent form has not been
140 submitted under paragraph a. or revoked under paragraph e.
Page 5

submitted under paragraph a. or revoked under paragraph e.
HB43 INTRODUCED
141 e. An employee or parent or guardian of a student may
142 revoke the individual's consent provided in paragraph a. by
143 informing the appropriate school administrator, as determined
144 by the local board of education. An employee or student for
145 whom consent has been revoked under this paragraph: (i) may
146 not participate in the period of prayer and reading of the
147 Bible or other religious text until the employee or parent or
148 guardian of the student submits a new consent form to the
149 local board of education; and (ii) remains bound by the waiver
150 described in the consent form.
151 (2) If a local board of education fails to hold the
152 vote as required by subdivision (1), the failure may be
153 reported to the State Superintendent of Education. Upon the
154 receipt of a reported failure, the State Superintendent of
155 Education shall investigate the reported violation and if he
156 or she determines, based on the results of the investigation,
157 that a local board of education failed to hold the vote as
158 required by subdivision (1), the State Superintendent of
159 Education shall provide the local board of education with an
160 opportunity to hold a vote within 90 days. If after 90 days
161 the local board of education continues to be noncompliant, the
162 State Superintendent of Education shall withhold 25 percent of
163 the state funding allocated to that local board of education
164 for the following fiscal year. If the local board of education
165 continues to refuse to hold the vote required by subdivision
166 (1), the Legislature shall provide for further reduction of
167 funding to the local board of education in the annual
168 appropriation of education funds.
Page 6

appropriation of education funds.
HB43 INTRODUCED
169 Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
170 Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
171 appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
172 paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
173 change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
174 for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
175 grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
176 internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
177 language; and translate effective dates.
178 END OF PROPOSED AMENDMENT
179 Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
180 shall be held in accordance with Sections 284 and 285 of the
181 Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws of this
182 state. The appropriate election official shall assign a ballot
183 number for the proposed constitutional amendment on the
184 election ballot and shall set forth the following description
185 of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
186 constitutional amendment:
187 "Proposing an amendment to the Constitution of Alabama
188 of 2022, to require local boards of education to adopt
189 policies requiring each public K-12 school to recite The
190 Pledge of Allegiance to the United States of America at the
191 commencement of the first class each school day; to require
192 local boards of education to vote whether to adopt policies
193 allowing consenting employees and students with consent from
194 their parent or guardian to participate in daily prayer and a
195 reading of the Bible or other religious text; to prohibit the
196 daily prayer or reading of the Bible or other religious text
Page 7

daily prayer or reading of the Bible or other religious text
HB43 INTRODUCED
197 from substituting for instructional time or being held in the
198 presence of individuals who have not consented to participate;
199 and to provide a mechanism for the withholding of funds from
200 local boards of education that fail to adhere to this
201 amendment.
202 Proposed by Act ____."
203 This description shall be followed by the following
204 language:
205 "Yes( ) No( )."
206 Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
207 a part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved
208 by a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 8